Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-135.01
Constables; fees; mileage.

Constables shall be allowed the same fees, including mileage, as are allowed sheriffs for like services as provided in section 33-117.

Laws 1974, LB 739, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 53.